Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE G. CORRECTIONS

CHAPTER 491. TEXAS BOARD OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE, TEXAS DEPARTMENT OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE: GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 491.001. DEFINITIONS. (a) In this subtitle, except for Chapter 511:

(1) "Board" means the Texas Board of Criminal Justice, except as provided by Section 508.001.

(2) "Community justice assistance division" means the community justice assistance division of the department.

(3) "Department" means the Texas Department of Criminal Justice, except in Chapter 509.

(4) "Executive director" means the executive director of the department.

(5) "Institutional division" means the institutional division of the department.

(6) "Internal audit division" means the internal audit division of the department.

(7) "Pardons and paroles division" means the pardons and paroles division of the department.

(8) "State jail division" means the state jail division of the department.

(b) A reference in other law to:

(1) "Board of Pardons and Paroles" means:

(A) the Board of Pardons and Paroles in any statute relating to a subject under the board's jurisdiction as provided by Chapter 508; or

(B) the pardons and paroles division in any statute relating to a subject under the division's jurisdiction as provided by Chapter 508.

(2) "Probation department" or "adult probation department" means a community supervision and corrections department established under Chapter 76, Government Code.

(3) "Texas Adult Probation Commission" means the community justice assistance division.

(4) "Texas Board of Corrections" means the board.

(5) "Texas Department of Corrections" means the institutional division.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.04, 7.17, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.06, 12.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 490, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.